Utah statutes.
31A-5-401.   Principal office and registered agent.

Each domestic insurance corporation shall have its principal office and place of business in this state.  By order, the commissioner may exempt a corporation from this requirement, in which case it is subject to the requirement of Section 31A-14-204.  The location of a domestic insurance corporation's principal office and the existence of a registered agent are governed by Title 16, Chapter 17, Model Registered Agents Act.

